Illinois, session 104th, SB2321.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 45 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 85/45 new)7    Sec. 45. First-choice pharmacy. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "first-choice pharmacy" means 9the pharmacy to which a prescription is initially sent by a 10prescriber.11    (b) If a first-choice pharmacy is unable to fill or 12provide a patient with a prescription, the first-choice 13pharmacy may forward the prescription order to another 14pharmacy that is able to fill the prescription.